Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1828
Real property taxes; redemption from sale; for whom made; reimbursement.

Any redemption made shall inure to the benefit of the person having the legal or equitable title to the property redeemed, subject to the right of the person making the same to be reimbursed by the person benefited.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 212, p. 466;

Laws 1905, c. 114, § 1, p. 518;

R.S.1913, § 6540;

C.S.1922, § 6068;

Laws 1923, c. 105, § 1, p. 261;

Laws 1925, c. 168, § 1, p. 441;

C.S.1929, § 77-2020;

Laws 1933, c. 136, § 8, p. 520;

Laws 1937, c. 167, § 28, p. 658;

Laws 1939, c. 98, § 28, p. 445;

Laws 1941, c. 157, § 28, p. 629;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2020;

R.S.1943, § 77-1828.

Redemption before delivery of the tax deed inures to benefit of one having legal or equitable title to the property redeemed. Mack v. Luebben, 215 Neb. 832, 341 N.W.2d 335 (1983).